src/pron-vro-morph.txt
LEXICON PronRoot
minä+Pron+Pers+1Sg:minä K "I" ;
sinä+Pron+Pers+2Sg:sinä K "you (sg.)" ;
hän+Pron+Pers+3Sg:hän K "he, she, it" ;
mö+Pron+Pers+1Pl:mö K "we" ;
tö+Pron+Pers+2Pl:tö K "you (pl.)" ;
hö+Pron+Pers+3Pl:hö K "they" ;
